apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="बना__vblex_tv">
      <e>       <p><l>ऊँगा</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँगे</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ऊँगी</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँगी</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एगा</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ओगे</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एगी</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ओगी</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एगा</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँगे</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एगी</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँगी</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाला</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाले</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ना</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ने</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ऊँ</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँ</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ओ</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँ</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ए</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एँ</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>इए</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ओ</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तें</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तीं</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>कर</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>के</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>या</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ए</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ई</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ईं</l><r>बना<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="चल__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ोगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेंगी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाला</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाले</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>नेवाली</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ना</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ने</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ूँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ें</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ती</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>कर</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>के</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

     

	<e lm="अड़"><i>अड़</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="कराह"><i>कराह</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="कूद"><i>कूद</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="खटक"><i>खटक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="खिसक"><i>खिसक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="गुजर"><i>गुजर</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="घट"><i>घट</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चमक"><i>चमक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चिपक"><i>चिपक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="चूक"><i>चूक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="छींक"><i>छींक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जुड़"><i>जुड़</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="झपट"><i>झपट</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="झूम"><i>झूम</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="झेंप"><i>झेंप</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="टहल"><i>टहल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ठहर"><i>ठहर</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="तड़प"><i>तड़प</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="थूक"><i>थूक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="नाच"><i>नाच</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="निपट"><i>निपट</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="पहुंच"><i>पहुंच</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="फुदक"><i>फुदक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="बच"><i>बच</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="बदल"><i>बदल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="बह"><i>बह</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="बिलख"><i>बिलख</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="भूल"><i>भूल</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="रुक"><i>रुक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="रेंग"><i>रेंग</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="लड़"><i>लड़</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ललकार"><i>ललकार</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="लौट"><i>लौट</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="सरक"><i>सरक</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="सुलझ"><i>सुलझ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="सूझ"><i>सूझ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="बैठ"><i>बैठ</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="रह"><i>रह</i><par n="चल__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="कुम्हला"><i>कुम्हला</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खिला"><i>खिला</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गंवा"><i>गंवा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गा"><i>गा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गुदगुदा"><i>गुदगुदा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="गुर्रा"><i>गुर्रा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चबा"><i>चबा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चुभा"><i>चुभा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छलका"><i>छलका</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जमा"><i>जमा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ठुकरा"><i>ठुकरा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="डुबा"><i>डुबा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="थपथपा"><i>थपथपा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दबा"><i>दबा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धो"><i>धो</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निभा"><i>निभा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पचा"><i>पचा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फुसफुसा"><i>फुसफुसा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बना"><i>बना</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बहला"><i>बहला</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बुझा"><i>बुझा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बो"><i>बो</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="भिगो"><i>भिगो</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मिटा"><i>मिटा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="सजा"><i>सजा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="हथिया"><i>हथिया</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पा"><i>पा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बना"><i>बना</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मना"><i>मना</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पका"><i>पका</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जमा"><i>जमा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बढा"><i>बढा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छिपा"><i>छिपा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="जला"><i>जला</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="हो"><i>हो</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="दोहरा"><i>दोहरा</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="फैला"><i>फैला</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="धो"><i>धो</i><par n="बना__vblex_tv"/></e>
